Vermont statutes. Title 11 Corporations, Partnerships, and Associations
Subchapter 4. Directors and Officers

§§ 221-230.
Repealed.
1971, No. 237 (Adj. Sess.), § 100.

§ 231.
Acknowledgments by stockholder or officer.

A person legally qualified to take acknowledgments shall not be disqualified to take such acknowledgments to an instrument in which a corporation is a party, by reason of his or her being a stockholder in or an officer or employee of such corporation.